src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1151 Y 13
SFX 1151 cka čanski
SFX 1151 cka čanskog
SFX 1151 cka čanskoga
SFX 1151 cka čanskom
SFX 1151 cka čanskome
SFX 1151 cka čanskim
SFX 1151 cka čanskih
SFX 1151 cka čanskima
SFX 1151 cka čanske
SFX 1151 cka čanska
SFX 1151 cka čanskoj
SFX 1151 cka čansku
SFX 1151 cka čansko

SFX 1152 Y 13
SFX 1152 cija tinski
SFX 1152 cija tinskog
SFX 1152 cija tinskoga
SFX 1152 cija tinskom
SFX 1152 cija tinskome
SFX 1152 cija tinskim
SFX 1152 cija tinskih
SFX 1152 cija tinskima
SFX 1152 cija tinske
SFX 1152 cija tinska
SFX 1152 cija tinskoj
SFX 1152 cija tinsku
SFX 1152 cija tinsko

SFX 1153 Y 13
SFX 1153 o oljanski
SFX 1153 o oljanskog
SFX 1153 o oljanskoga
SFX 1153 o oljanskom
SFX 1153 o oljanskome
SFX 1153 o oljanskim
SFX 1153 o oljanskih
SFX 1153 o oljanskima
SFX 1153 o oljanske
SFX 1153 o oljanska
SFX 1153 o oljanskoj
SFX 1153 o oljansku
SFX 1153 o oljansko

SFX 1154 Y 13
SFX 1154 o olski
SFX 1154 o olskog
SFX 1154 o olskoga
SFX 1154 o olskom
SFX 1154 o olskome
SFX 1154 o olskim
SFX 1154 o olskih
SFX 1154 o olskima
SFX 1154 o olske
SFX 1154 o olska
SFX 1154 o olskoj
SFX 1154 o olsku
SFX 1154 o olsko

SFX 1155 Y 13
SFX 1155 ck čki
SFX 1155 ck čkog
SFX 1155 ck čkoga
SFX 1155 ck čkom
SFX 1155 ck čkome
SFX 1155 ck čkim
SFX 1155 ck čkih
SFX 1155 ck čkima
SFX 1155 ck čke
SFX 1155 ck čka
SFX 1155 ck čkoj
SFX 1155 ck čku
SFX 1155 ck čko

SFX 1156 Y 13
SFX 1156 nik ački
SFX 1156 nik ačkog
SFX 1156 nik ačkoga
SFX 1156 nik ačkom
SFX 1156 nik ačkome
SFX 1156 nik ačkim
SFX 1156 nik ačkih
SFX 1156 nik ačkima
SFX 1156 nik ačke
SFX 1156 nik ačka
SFX 1156 nik ačkoj
SFX 1156 nik ačku
SFX 1156 nik ačko

SFX 1157 Y 13
SFX 1157 ke ački
SFX 1157 ke ačkog
SFX 1157 ke ačkoga
SFX 1157 ke ačkom
SFX 1157 ke ačkome
SFX 1157 ke ačkim
SFX 1157 ke ačkih
SFX 1157 ke ačkima
SFX 1157 ke ačke
SFX 1157 ke ačka
SFX 1157 ke ačkoj
SFX 1157 ke ačku
SFX 1157 ke ačko

SFX 1158 Y 13
SFX 1158 e eanski
SFX 1158 e eanskog
SFX 1158 e eanskoga
SFX 1158 e eanskom
SFX 1158 e eanskome
SFX 1158 e eanskim
SFX 1158 e eanskih
SFX 1158 e eanskima
SFX 1158 e eanske
SFX 1158 e eanska
SFX 1158 e eanskoj
SFX 1158 e eansku
SFX 1158 e eansko

SFX 1159 Y 13
SFX 1159 ke čki
SFX 1159 ke čkog
SFX 1159 ke čkoga
SFX 1159 ke čkom
SFX 1159 ke čkome
SFX 1159 ke čkim
SFX 1159 ke čkih
SFX 1159 ke čkima
SFX 1159 ke čke
SFX 1159 ke čka
SFX 1159 ke čkoj
SFX 1159 ke čku
SFX 1159 ke čko

SFX 1160 Y 13
SFX 1160 o ački
SFX 1160 o ačkog
SFX 1160 o ačkoga
SFX 1160 o ačkom
SFX 1160 o ačkome
SFX 1160 o ačkim
SFX 1160 o ačkih
SFX 1160 o ačkima
SFX 1160 o ačke
SFX 1160 o ačka
SFX 1160 o ačkoj
SFX 1160 o ačku
SFX 1160 o ačko

SFX 1161 Y 13
SFX 1161 đ đski
SFX 1161 đ đskog
SFX 1161 đ đskoga
SFX 1161 đ đskom
SFX 1161 đ đskome
SFX 1161 đ đskim
SFX 1161 đ đskih
SFX 1161 đ đskima
SFX 1161 đ đske
SFX 1161 đ đska
SFX 1161 đ đskoj
SFX 1161 đ đsku
SFX 1161 đ đsko

SFX 1162 Y 13
SFX 1162 r ranski
SFX 1162 r ranskog
SFX 1162 r ranskoga
SFX 1162 r ranskom
SFX 1162 r ranskome
SFX 1162 r ranskim
SFX 1162 r ranskih
SFX 1162 r ranskima
SFX 1162 r ranske
SFX 1162 r ranska
SFX 1162 r ranskoj
SFX 1162 r ransku
SFX 1162 r ransko

SFX 1163 Y 13
SFX 1163 dž čki
SFX 1163 dž čkog
SFX 1163 dž čkoga
SFX 1163 dž čkom
SFX 1163 dž čkome
SFX 1163 dž čkim
SFX 1163 dž čkih
SFX 1163 dž čkima
SFX 1163 dž čke
SFX 1163 dž čka
SFX 1163 dž čkoj
SFX 1163 dž čku
SFX 1163 dž čko

SFX 1164 Y 13
SFX 1164 o oški
SFX 1164 o oškog
SFX 1164 o oškoga
SFX 1164 o oškom
SFX 1164 o oškome
SFX 1164 o oškim
SFX 1164 o oških
SFX 1164 o oškima
SFX 1164 o oške
SFX 1164 o oška
SFX 1164 o oškoj
SFX 1164 o ošku
SFX 1164 o oško

SFX 1165 Y 13
SFX 1165 a ki
SFX 1165 a kog
SFX 1165 a koga
SFX 1165 a kom
SFX 1165 a kome
SFX 1165 a kim
SFX 1165 a kih
SFX 1165 a kima
SFX 1165 a ke
SFX 1165 a ka
SFX 1165 a koj
SFX 1165 a ku
SFX 1165 a ko

SFX 1166 Y 13
SFX 1166 b bački
SFX 1166 b bačkog
SFX 1166 b bačkoga
SFX 1166 b bačkom
SFX 1166 b bačkome
SFX 1166 b bačkim
SFX 1166 b bačkih
SFX 1166 b bačkima
SFX 1166 b bačke
SFX 1166 b bačka
SFX 1166 b bačkoj
SFX 1166 b bačku
SFX 1166 b bačko

SFX 1167 Y 13
SFX 1167 ki ki
SFX 1167 ki kog
SFX 1167 ki koga
SFX 1167 ki kom
SFX 1167 ki kome
SFX 1167 ki kim
SFX 1167 ki kih
SFX 1167 ki kima
SFX 1167 ki ke
SFX 1167 ki ka
SFX 1167 ki koj
SFX 1167 ki ku
SFX 1167 ki ko

SFX 1168 Y 13
SFX 1168 zd žđanski
SFX 1168 zd žđanskog
SFX 1168 zd žđanskoga
SFX 1168 zd žđanskom
SFX 1168 zd žđanskome
SFX 1168 zd žđanskim
SFX 1168 zd žđanskih
SFX 1168 zd žđanskima
SFX 1168 zd žđanske
SFX 1168 zd žđanska
SFX 1168 zd žđanskoj
SFX 1168 zd žđansku
SFX 1168 zd žđansko

SFX 1169 Y 13
SFX 1169 zija žanski
SFX 1169 zija žanskog
SFX 1169 zija žanskoga
SFX 1169 zija žanskom
SFX 1169 zija žanskome
SFX 1169 zija žanskim
SFX 1169 zija žanskih
SFX 1169 zija žanskima
SFX 1169 zija žanske
SFX 1169 zija žanska
SFX 1169 zija žanskoj
SFX 1169 zija žansku
SFX 1169 zija žansko

SFX 1170 Y 13
SFX 1170 ka čanski
SFX 1170 ka čanskog
SFX 1170 ka čanskoga
SFX 1170 ka čanskom
SFX 1170 ka čanskome
SFX 1170 ka čanskim
SFX 1170 ka čanskih
SFX 1170 ka čanskima
SFX 1170 ka čanske
SFX 1170 ka čanska
SFX 1170 ka čanskoj
SFX 1170 ka čansku
SFX 1170 ka čansko

SFX 1171 Y 13
SFX 1171 a ljanski
SFX 1171 a ljanskog
SFX 1171 a ljanskoga
SFX 1171 a ljanskom
SFX 1171 a ljanskome
SFX 1171 a ljanskim
SFX 1171 a ljanskih
SFX 1171 a ljanskima
SFX 1171 a ljanske
SFX 1171 a ljanska
SFX 1171 a ljanskoj
SFX 1171 a ljansku
SFX 1171 a ljansko

SFX 1172 Y 13
SFX 1172 šje ki
SFX 1172 šje kog
SFX 1172 šje koga
SFX 1172 šje kom
SFX 1172 šje kome
SFX 1172 šje kim
SFX 1172 šje kih
SFX 1172 šje kima
SFX 1172 šje ke
SFX 1172 šje ka
SFX 1172 šje koj
SFX 1172 šje ku
SFX 1172 šje ko

SFX 1173 Y 13
SFX 1173 avija ovenski
SFX 1173 avija ovenskog
SFX 1173 avija ovenskoga
SFX 1173 avija ovenskom
SFX 1173 avija ovenskome
SFX 1173 avija ovenskim
SFX 1173 avija ovenskih
SFX 1173 avija ovenskima
SFX 1173 avija ovenske
SFX 1173 avija ovenska
SFX 1173 avija ovenskoj
SFX 1173 avija ovensku
SFX 1173 avija ovensko

SFX 1174 Y 13
SFX 1174 dž džanski
SFX 1174 dž džanskog
SFX 1174 dž džanskoga
SFX 1174 dž džanskom
SFX 1174 dž džanskome
SFX 1174 dž džanskim
SFX 1174 dž džanskih
SFX 1174 dž džanskima
SFX 1174 dž džanske
SFX 1174 dž džanska
SFX 1174 dž džanskoj
SFX 1174 dž džansku
SFX 1174 dž džansko

SFX 1175 Y 13
SFX 1175 bi pski
SFX 1175 bi pskog
SFX 1175 bi pskoga
SFX 1175 bi pskom
SFX 1175 bi pskome
SFX 1175 bi pskim
SFX 1175 bi pskih
SFX 1175 bi pskima
SFX 1175 bi pske
SFX 1175 bi pska
SFX 1175 bi pskoj
SFX 1175 bi psku
SFX 1175 bi psko

SFX 1176 Y 13
SFX 1176 e eški
SFX 1176 e eškog
SFX 1176 e eškoga
SFX 1176 e eškom
SFX 1176 e eškome
SFX 1176 e eškim
SFX 1176 e eških
SFX 1176 e eškima
SFX 1176 e eške
SFX 1176 e eška
SFX 1176 e eškoj
SFX 1176 e ešku
SFX 1176 e eško

SFX 1177 Y 13
SFX 1177 u ujski
SFX 1177 u ujskog
SFX 1177 u ujskoga
SFX 1177 u ujskom
SFX 1177 u ujskome
SFX 1177 u ujskim
SFX 1177 u ujskih
SFX 1177 u ujskima
SFX 1177 u ujske
SFX 1177 u ujska
SFX 1177 u ujskoj
SFX 1177 u ujsku
SFX 1177 u ujsko

SFX 1178 Y 13
SFX 1178 a eski
SFX 1178 a eskog
SFX 1178 a eskoga
SFX 1178 a eskom
SFX 1178 a eskome
SFX 1178 a eskim
SFX 1178 a eskih
SFX 1178 a eskima
SFX 1178 a eske
SFX 1178 a eska
SFX 1178 a eskoj
SFX 1178 a esku
SFX 1178 a esko

SFX 1179 Y 13
SFX 1179 zija ški
SFX 1179 zija škog
SFX 1179 zija škoga
SFX 1179 zija škom
SFX 1179 zija škome
SFX 1179 zija škim
SFX 1179 zija ških
SFX 1179 zija škima
SFX 1179 zija ške
SFX 1179 zija ška
SFX 1179 zija škoj
SFX 1179 zija šku
SFX 1179 zija ško

SFX 1180 Y 13
SFX 1180 le lanski
SFX 1180 le lanskog
SFX 1180 le lanskoga
SFX 1180 le lanskom
SFX 1180 le lanskome
SFX 1180 le lanskim
SFX 1180 le lanskih
SFX 1180 le lanskima
SFX 1180 le lanske
SFX 1180 le lanska
SFX 1180 le lanskoj
SFX 1180 le lansku
SFX 1180 le lansko

SFX 1181 Y 13
SFX 1181 he ški
SFX 1181 he škog
SFX 1181 he škoga
SFX 1181 he škom
SFX 1181 he škome
SFX 1181 he škim
SFX 1181 he ških
SFX 1181 he škima
SFX 1181 he ške
SFX 1181 he ška
SFX 1181 he škoj
SFX 1181 he šku
SFX 1181 he ško
