src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
grocka/1151
dalmacija/1152
do/1153
dobrodo/1154
donjeck/1155
dubrovnik/1156
dujke/1157
dulebe/1158
dušanbe/1158
đake/1159
đakovo/1160
đerađ/1161
ejr/1162
enkoridž/1163
erebro/1164
žiča/1165
žljeb/1166
zagreb/1166
zaostro/1164
zapadnobački/1167
zvezd/1168
zvijezd/1168
zeoke/1159
zimbabve/1158
zlakusa/1165
indonezija/1169
jablanički/1167
jamajka/1170
jamusukro/1164
jerma/1171
jošje/1172
jugoslavija/1173
južnobački/1167
karadž/1174
karibi/1175
karlsrue/1176
katmandu/1177
kembridž/1163
kina/1178
kirgizija/1179
kitakjušu/1177
kjušu/1177
klenike/1159
klisa/1165
kobe/1158
kovizle/1180
kožuhe/1181
kosovskomitrovački/1167
kraljevo/1160
krušje/1172
larisa/1165
lešje/1172
lilongve/1158
lisa/1165
luke/1159
ljeb/1166
majorka/1170
manajle/1180
marke/1157
međuvršje/1172
mesa/1165
mikronezija/1169
mokro/1164
mombasa/1165
moravički/1167
motike/1159
nijue/1176
odesa/1165
orašje/1172
orindž/1174
pančevo/1160
parma/1171
pećki/1167
polinezija/1169
popučke/1157
potreb/1166
pretoke/1159
prilike/1159
puke/1159
raški/1167
riđake/1159
saragosa/1165
svrhe/1181
severnobački/1167
sedobro/1164
starčevo/1160
tisa/1165
tolisa/1165
toplički/1167
umka/1170
honšu/1177
cvetke/1157
čazma/1171
čalma/1171
čengdu/1177
čerkezija/1179
čiloe/1158
čmanjke/1157
